test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-dantsh_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - daņtš: # Noun 105 'eng /est tants/fin' - full paradigm
     daņtš+N+Sg+Nom: daņtš
     daņtš+N+Sg+Gen: daņtš
     daņtš+N+Sg+Par: daņtšõ
     daņtš+N+Sg+Dat: daņtšõn
     daņtš+N+Sg+Ins: daņtšõks
     daņtš+N+Sg+Ill: daņtšõ
     daņtš+N+Sg+Ela: daņtšõst
     daņtš+N+Pl+Nom: dāņtšõd
     daņtš+N+Pl+Gen: dāņtšõd
     daņtš+N+Pl+Par: dāņtšidi
     daņtš+N+Pl+Dat: dāņtšõdõn
     daņtš+N+Pl+Ins: dāņtšõdõks
     daņtš+N+Pl+Ill: dāņtšiz
     daņtš+N+Pl+Ela: dāņtšist
